Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.510 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 169 beginning at the Double Creek
Bridge extending south to the county line between Nowata County and
Rogers County shall be designated as the “CPT David Ward Neely
Memorial Highway”. The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 16, 2026 - DO PASS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1956 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)